Utah statutes.
78B-13-301.   Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Petitioner" means a person who seeks enforcement of a child custody
determination or enforcement of an order for the return of the child under the
Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.
(2)  "Respondent" means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced
for enforcement of a child custody determination or enforcement of an order
for the return of the child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of
International Child Abduction.
